Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.260

Posting citations for violation of RCW 18.51.060.

(1) Each citation for a violation specified in RCW 18.51.060 which is issued pursuant to this section, or a copy or copies thereof, shall be prominently posted, as prescribed in regulations issued by the director, until the violation is corrected to the satisfaction of the department up to a maximum of one hundred twenty days. The citation or copy shall be posted in a place or places in plain view of the patients in the nursing home, persons visiting those patients, and persons who inquire about placement in the facility.

(2) The department shall require a nursing home that is subject to a stop placement order or limited stop placement order under RCW 18.51.060 to publicly post in a conspicuous place at the nursing home a standardized notice that the department has issued a stop placement order or limited stop placement order for the nursing home. The standardized notice shall be developed by the department to include the date of the stop placement order or limited stop placement order, any conditions placed upon the nursing home's license, contact information for the department, contact information for the administrator or provider of the nursing home, and a statement that anyone may contact the department or the administrator or provider for further information. The notice must remain posted until the department has terminated the stop placement order or limited stop placement order.

[ 2021 c 159 s 7; 1987 c 476 s 26; 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—2021 c 159: See note following RCW 18.20.520.